Utah, session 2026, HB225.
Section 1. Section 57-1-49 is enacted to read:57-1-49. Disclosure related to unincorporated real property.(1)As used in this section, "unincorporated" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-1-104.(2)On or before the day on which a person conveys unincorporated real property, the person shall provide to the person to whom the person conveys the unincorporated real property a statement acknowledging that the boundaries of the unincorporated real property may be subject to:(a)adverse possession;(b)boundary by acquiescence; or(c)a right-of-way under Title 72, Chapter 5, Right-Of-Way Act.(3)After a person provides the statement described in Subsection (2), each party to the conveyance of the unincorporated real property shall sign the statement.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.